Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.031

Court facilities.

If proper rooms in which to hold the court, and for the accommodation of the officers thereof, are not provided by the state, together with attendants, furniture, fuel, lights, record books and stationery, suitable and sufficient for the transaction of business, the court, or any three justices thereof, may direct the clerk of the supreme court to provide the same; and the expense thereof, certified by any three justices to be correct, shall be paid out of the state treasury out of any funds therein not otherwise appropriated. Such moneys shall be subject to the order of the clerk of the supreme court, and be by him or her disbursed on proper vouchers, and accounted for by him or her in annual settlements with the governor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 9; 1973 c 106 s 1; 1955 c 38 s 1; 1890 p 322 s 4; RRS s 3.]